Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3428
Health care provider; refusal to honor health care decision; duties.

(1) Nothing in sections 30-3401 to 30-3432 shall obligate a health care provider organization to honor a health care decision by an attorney in fact that the health care provider organization would not honor if the decision had been made by the principal because the decision is contrary to a formally adopted policy of the health care provider organization that is expressly based on religious beliefs or sincerely held ethical or moral convictions central to the operating principles of the health care provider organization. The health care provider organization may refuse to honor the decision whether made by the principal or by the attorney in fact if the health care provider organization has informed the principal or the attorney in fact of such policy, if reasonably possible. If the attorney in fact is unable or unwilling to arrange a transfer to another health care facility, the health care provider organization may intervene to facilitate such a transfer.

(2) Nothing in sections 30-3401 to 30-3432 shall obligate an individual as a health care provider to honor or cooperate with a health care decision by an attorney in fact that the individual would not honor or cooperate with if the decision had been made by the principal because the decision is contrary to the individual's religious beliefs or sincerely held moral or ethical convictions. The individual health care provider shall promptly inform the attorney in fact and the health care provider organization of his or her refusal to honor or cooperate with the decision of the attorney in fact. In such event, the health care provider organization shall promptly assist in the transfer of responsibility for the principal to another individual health care provider who is willing to honor the decision of the attorney in fact.

Laws 1992, LB 696, § 27.